Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.280

Decree of adoption—Transmittal to state registrar of vital statistics.

After a decree of adoption is entered, as soon as the time for appeal has expired, or if an appeal is taken, and the adoption is affirmed on appeal, the clerk of the court shall transmit to the state registrar of vital statistics a certified copy of the decree, along with any additional information and fees required by the registrar.

[ 1984 c 155 s 28.]